Maryland, session 2025, HB0934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–5201.
In this subtitle, “Center” means the Center for Firearm Violence Prevention and
Intervention.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0934*

HOUSE BILL 934
13–5202.
(b) The purpose of the Center is to reduce firearm violence, harm from firearm
violence, and misuse of firearms in the State by partnering with federal, State, and local
agencies and affected communities to implement a public health approach to firearm
violence reduction.
13–5204.
(a) The Center shall:
(1) Work in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention,
Youth, and Victim Services or any successor agency, the Maryland State Police, and any
other relevant State or local agency to ensure a multidepartmental approach to reducing
firearm violence;
(2) Solicit and consider recommendations from:
(i) Communities disproportionately impacted by firearm violence;
(ii) Public health experts;
(iii) Individuals or organizations with expertise in firearm safety and
training; and
(iv) Any other experts, groups, or organizations as the executive
director determines appropriate and necessary; and
(3) (i) On or before May 1, 2025, submit a preliminary State Plan for a
Public Health Approach to Reducing Firearm Violence to guide the work of the Center to
the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly; and
(ii) On or before May 1, 2029, and every 4 years thereafter, submit a
State Strategic Plan for Firearm Violence Reduction Using Public Health Strategies to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.
(b) The Center may:
(1) Offer training and technical assistance to State and local agencies,
health care professionals, and community and faith–based organizations to increase
capacity to implement evidence–based firearm violence prevention and intervention
strategies;

HOUSE BILL 934 3
(2) Issue best practice guidance and model processes in consultation with
affected communities regarding implementation of evidence–based firearm violence
prevention and intervention strategies;
(3) In consultation with the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention, Youth,
and Victim Services or any successor agency, facilitate cross–jurisdictional data and
information sharing;
(4) (I) Conduct public awareness campaigns AND CREATE
RESOURCES, TOOLS, AND EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS RELATED TO:
1. THE SECURE STORAGE OF FIREARMS;
2. EXTREME RISK PROTECTIVE ORDERS;
3. SUICIDE PREVENTION, INCLUDING THE 9–8–8
SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE; AND
4. ANY OTHER TOPICS THE CENTER DETERMINES
APPROPRIATE AND NECESSARY TO PROMOTE FIREARM SAFETY IN THE STATE; AND
(II) CONSULT WITH STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES AND
THIRD–PARTY ORGANIZATIONS IN CARRYING OUT THE POWERS ESTABLISHED
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM;
(5) Share data and collaborate with higher education and research
institutions regarding the prevention of firearm violence;
(6) Promote the development of evidence–based firearm violence
prevention initiatives in affected communities throughout the State; and
(7) Engage in any other activity consistent with the Center’s mission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.